Florida, session 2026, SB446.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 288.12267, Florida Statutes, is created 24 to read: 25 288.12267âLarge-scale county destination marketing 26 organizations.â 27 (1)âDEFINITION.âFor purposes of this section, the term 28 âlarge-scale county destination marketing organizationâ has the 29 same meaning as the term âcounty destination marketing 30 organizationâ as defined in s. 288.005, but refers only to such 31 organizations or agencies with an annual operating budget of $5 32 million or more. 33 (2)âREGISTRATION.âA large-scale county destination 34 marketing organization must register with the Department of 35 State, and the department shall maintain a directory on its 36 website of all large-scale county destination marketing 37 organizations operating in this state. 38 (3)âMATCHING REQUIREMENTS.âA one-to-one match is required 39 of private to public contributions to a large-scale county 40 destination marketing organization. Public contributions include 41 all state and local appropriations to a large-scale county 42 destination marketing organization. 43 (a)âFor purposes of calculating the required one-to-one 44 match, a large-scale county destination marketing organization 45 shall receive matching private contributions in one of four 46 private match categories. The large-scale county destination 47 marketing organization shall maintain documentation of such 48 categorized contributions on file and make such documentation 49 available for inspection upon reasonable notice during its 50 regular business hours. The private match categories are: 51 1.âDirect cash contributions from private sources, which 52 include, but are not limited to, cash derived from strategic 53 alliances, contributions of stocks and bonds, and partnership 54 contributions. 55 2.âFees for services, which include, but are not limited 56 to, event participation, research, and brochure placement. 57 3.âCooperative advertising, which is limited to partner 58 expenditures for paid media placement, partner expenditures for 59 collateral material distribution, and the actual market value of 60 contributed productions, broadcast air time, and print space. 61 4.âIn-kind contributions, which are limited to the actual 62 market value of promotional contributions of partner-supplied 63 benefits to target audiences and the actual market value of 64 nonpartner-supplied air time or print space contributed for the 65 broadcasting or printing of such promotions that would otherwise 66 require tourist promotion expenditures by a large-scale county 67 destination marketing organization for advertising, air travel, 68 rental car fees, hotel rooms, RV or campsite space rental, 69 onsite guest services, and admission tickets. The net value of 70 air time or print space, if any, is deemed to be the actual 71 market value of the air time or print space, based on an average 72 of actual unit prices paid contemporaneously for comparable 73 times or spaces, less the value of increased ratings or other 74 benefits realized by the media outlet as a result of the 75 promotion. 76 77 Contributions from a governmental entity or from an entity that 78 received more than 50 percent of its revenue in the previous 79 fiscal year from public sources, including revenue derived from 80 taxes, from fees, or from other government revenues, are not 81 considered private contributions for purposes of calculating the 82 required one-to-one match. 83 (b)âIf a large-scale county destination marketing 84 organization fails to meet the one-to-one match requirements of 85 this subsection, the large-scale county destination marketing 86 organization must, by June 30 of each fiscal year, revert all 87 unmatched public contributions to the treasuries of the 88 corresponding counties or municipalities with which the large 89 scale county destination marketing organization is contracted. 90 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.